Louisiana, session 2026, HB838.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:1301, 1302, 1304(A)(1) through (3) and (B), 1306(C), and
1306.1(A) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1301. Vehicles without required equipment or in unsafe condition
No person shall drive or move on any highway any motor vehicle, low-speed
vehicle as defined in R.S. 32:1(40)(50), trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer, or any
combination thereof, unless the equipment upon any such vehicle is in good working
order and adjustment as required in this Chapter and the vehicle is in such safe
mechanical condition as not to endanger the driver or other occupant or any person
upon the highway. Every motor vehicle, low-speed vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, and
Page 1 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1225 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 838
pole trailer registered in this state which is required to be inspected pursuant to the
provisions of this Chapter shall bear a valid safety inspection certificate issued in the
state of Louisiana, except as otherwise provided by this Chapter.
§1302. Inspection Enforcement by officers of the department
A. The Director of Public Safety, members of the State Police and such other
officers and employees of the department as the director may designate, may at any
time upon reasonable cause to believe that a vehicle is unsafe or not equipped as
required by law, or that its equipment is not in proper adjustment or repair, require
the driver of such vehicle to stop and submit such vehicle to an inspection and such
test with reference thereto as may be appropriate, and issue a citation to the operator
of such vehicle.
B. In the event such vehicle is found to be in unsafe condition or any
required part or equipment is not present or is not in proper repair and adjustment the
officer shall give a written notice to the driver and shall send a copy to the
department. Said notice shall require that such vehicle be placed in safe condition
and its equipment in proper repair and adjustment specifying the particulars with
reference thereto and that a certificate of inspection and approval be obtained within
5 days.
§1304. Secretary to require periodical periodic inspection; commercial and student
transportation vehicles
A.(1) The secretary shall at least once every other year, but not more
frequently than twice each year, require that every motor vehicle, low-speed vehicle,
trailer, semitrailer, and pole trailer registered in this state commercial motor vehicle
registered in this state and required to be inspected pursuant to 49 CFR Part 396,
including Part 396.17 and "Appendix G" thereof, and every student transportation
vehicle registered in this state and required to be inspected pursuant to LAC
28:CXIII.701(A)(3) be inspected and that an official certificate of inspection and
approval be obtained for such vehicle. However, overweight and oversize mobile
homes requiring a state permit shall not be required to bear a certificate of approved
Page 2 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1225 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 838
inspection when being moved by a bonded carrier as defined by law nor shall used
motor vehicles in transit by a dealer be required to have a certificate of inspection
and approval. In addition, the secretary shall require motor vehicles registered in a
parish or municipality subject to the federal Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. 7401 et seq.,
or continuous regulations promulgated by the United States Environmental
Protection Agency requiring performance of the inspection and maintenance (I/M)
program, be inspected in accordance with R.S. 30:2054(B)(8). Nothing in this
Section shall be construed to relieve any operator of a motor vehicle, low-speed
vehicle as defined in R.S. 32:1(50), trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer, or any
combination thereof from compliance with the provisions of R.S. 32:1301.
(2) Such inspection should be made and such certificates obtained with
respect to the mechanism, brakes, and equipment of every vehicle vehicles required
to be inspected as shall be designated by the secretary. The secretary shall require
the inspection of all approved automotive emission control devices installed on
motor vehicles required to be inspected and that were produced after model year
1980 to insure ensure that such devices are operative and have not been tampered
with. However, low-speed vehicles shall not be subject to regular emissions
inspections.
(3)(a) The secretary shall formulate and promulgate a set of standards for the
control and regulation of emission control devices on all automobiles and other
motor vehicles subject to inspection pursuant to this Section, which standards shall
be consistent with other federal and state regulations for the installation and
operation of approved emission control devices.
(b) The secretary is hereby authorized to make necessary rules and
regulations for the administration and enforcement of this Section and to designate
any periods of time during which owners of vehicles, subject to this Section, shall
display upon such vehicles certificates of inspection and approval and shall produce
them on demand of any officer or employee of the department designated by the
Page 3 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1225 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 838
secretary or any police or peace officer when authorized by the secretary. However,
an owner or operator of a light trailer, utility trailer, boat trailer, or farm trailer need
only provide a valid inspection sticker on demand of an inspecting officer to be in
compliance with the inspection requirements of this Chapter.
* * *
B. The secretary is hereby authorized to make necessary rules and
regulations for the administration and enforcement of this Section and to designate
any periods of time during which owners of vehicles, subject to this Section, shall
display upon such vehicles certificates of inspection and approval or shall produce
the same on demand of any officer or employee of the department designated by the
secretary or any police or peace officer when authorized by the secretary. Owners
and operators of all motor vehicles, subject to this Section, required to be equipped
with windshields shall display on the lower left hand corner of the windshield a
certificate of inspection affixed thereto by a duly authorized motor vehicle inspection
station. The secretary shall accept the certificate of inspection and approval issued
by any municipality pursuant to any municipal ordinance adopted prior to July 27,
1960. However, each person who applies for a motor vehicle inspection tag in the
city of New Orleans shall produce written proof of insurance from an insurer that the
motor vehicle is covered by security and shall declare in writing that he or she
intends to maintain said security at all times while said vehicle is used upon the
highways of Louisiana.
* * *
§1306. Operation of official inspection stations
* * *
C.(1)(a) A charge or fee shall be charged for each certificate of inspection
and approval issued, as provided in this Subsection.
(b) Persons operating an official inspection station shall offer certificates of
inspection that are valid for both one year and two year periods. The owner of the
vehicle shall have the option of purchasing a one year or a two year certificate. A
Page 4 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1225 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 838
charge or fee shall be charged for each year of validity of the certificate of inspection
and approval issued, as provided in this Subsection.
(c) The provisions of Subparagraph (b) of this Paragraph shall not apply to
the inspection programs provided for in Paragraphs (3) and (5) of this Subsection and
to student transportation vehicles.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this Subsection, for each year of validity
of the certificate issued, a charge or fee of ten dollars shall be charged, four dollars
and seventy-five cents of which shall be retained by the operator of the motor vehicle
inspection station conducting the inspection, four dollars of which shall be
transferred to the office of state police for use in traffic law enforcement, and one
dollar and twenty-five cents shall be transferred to the office of motor vehicles for
expenses associated with the motor vehicle inspection and financial responsibility
programs. Included in the inspection shall be the adjustment of headlights when
needed and mechanically practical, at no additional cost to the operator of the motor
vehicle inspected.
(3)(a) (2)(a) For parishes and municipalities that have a vehicle inspection
and maintenance program required by the federal Clean Air Act or regulations
promulgated by the United States Environmental Protection Agency, an additional
eight dollars shall be charged for each inspection that includes the performance of
the inspection and maintenance (I/M) program pursuant to the provisions of R.S.
30:2054(B)(8) for 1980 or newer model year motor vehicles. The motor vehicle
inspection station shall retain six dollars of the additional charge for implementation
and performance of the I/M program. Two dollars of the additional charge shall be
transferred to the Louisiana Department of Environmental Quality to implement and
operate the inspection and maintenance program.
(b) The department shall promulgate and adopt rules and regulations
necessary to implement the provisions of this Paragraph.
(c) The provisions of this Paragraph shall not apply to any trailer, light
trailer, or semitrailer.
Page 5 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1225 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 838
(4) (3) The maintenance and inspection program and the fees provided for
in Paragraph (3) (2) of this Subsection shall be discontinued when the I/M program
is discontinued as allowed by the federal Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. 7401 et seq., and
regulations promulgated by the United States Environmental Protection Agency or
agreements with the agency concerning the implementation of this program, or result
in any other noncompliance regarding this Subsection.
(5) (4) An annual charge or fee of thirty dollars shall be charged for the
inspection of all commercial motor vehicles which are required to be inspected under
the provisions of Part 396 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations 49 CFR
Part 396, including Part 396.17 and "Appendix G" thereof. No charges or fees other
than the thirty-dollar fee shall be charged for a commercial motor vehicle inspection.
Of the thirty-dollar fee, the motor vehicle inspection station operator who performs
this inspection shall retain twenty-three dollars and seventy-five cents; two dollars
and twenty-five cents shall be transferred to the office of motor vehicles for expenses
associated with motor vehicle and financial responsibility programs; and four dollars
of which shall be transferred to the office of state police for use in traffic law
enforcement. Included in the inspection shall be the adjustment of headlights at no
additional cost to the operator of the motor vehicle being inspected. The Legislature
of Louisiana hereby declares that a commercial motor vehicle inspection is much
more extensive than the inspection mandated in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection and
that the increase in the fee or charge for the inspection of commercial vehicles is
based on the difference in the two types of inspection.
(6)(a) (5)(a) The charge or fee for the inspection of student transportation
vehicles which are required to be inspected under pursuant to LAC
28:CXIII.701(A)(3) shall be twenty dollars. No charges or fees other than the
twenty-dollar fee shall be charged for a student transportation vehicle inspection. Of
the twenty-dollar fee, the motor vehicle inspection station operator who performs
this inspection shall retain fourteen dollars and seventy-five cents; one dollar and
twenty-five cents shall be transferred to the office of motor vehicles for expenses
Page 6 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1225 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 838
associated with motor vehicle and financial responsibility programs; and four dollars
shall be transferred to the office of state police for use in traffic law enforcement.
(b) The adjustment of headlights shall be included in the inspection at no
additional cost to the owner or operator of the school bus being inspected.
(c) The Legislature of Louisiana hereby declares that a student transportation
vehicle inspection is much more extensive than the inspection required of other
motor vehicles and that the increase in the fee or charge for the inspection of student
transportation vehicles is based on the difference in these types of inspections.
* * *
§1306.1. Inspection and maintenance program fees; nonattainment area; local
election
A. Upon adoption of a proposition approved by the voters of a nonattainment
area parish as provided for in this Section, seven dollars shall be charged for each
inspection that includes the performance of the inspection and maintenance (I/M)
program pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 30:2054(B)(8) for 1980 or newer model
year motor vehicles. This charge shall be in addition to the charge or fee provided
for in R.S. 32:1306(C)(3)(a) R.S. 32:1306(C)(2)(a).
* * *